Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201819-5315
Additional assessment or levy; procedure.

If, subsequent to the levy of taxes or assessments, the use of any parcel of land shall change so that, had the new use existed at the time of making such levy, the assessment or levy on such parcel would have been higher than the levy or assessment actually made, an additional assessment or levy may be made on such parcel by the city council taking into consideration the new and changed use of the property. Reassessments or changes in the rate of levy of assessments or taxes may be made by the city council after notice and hearing as provided in section 19-5314. The city council shall adopt a resolution of intention to change the rate of levy at least fifteen days prior to the hearing required for changes. The resolution shall specify the proposed change and shall give the time and place of the hearing. The levy of any additional assessment or tax shall not reduce or affect in any manner the assessments previously levied.

Laws 2017, LB97, § 15.